Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.56.210

Fixing date for recall election—Notice.

If, at the conclusion of the verification and canvass, it is found that a petition for recall bears the required number of signatures of certified legal voters, the officer with whom the petition is filed shall promptly certify the petitions as sufficient and fix a date for the special election to determine whether or not the officer charged shall be recalled and discharged from office. The special election shall be held not less than forty-five nor more than ninety days from the certification and, whenever possible, on one of the dates provided in RCW 29A.04.330, but no recall election may be held between the date of the primary and the date of the general election in any calendar year. Notice shall be given in the manner as required by law for special elections in the state or in the political subdivision, as the case may be.

[ 2013 c 11 s 55; 2003 c 111 s 1417. Prior: 1984 c 170 s 8; 1977 ex.s. c 361 s 108; 1971 ex.s. c 205 s 5; 1965 c 9 s 29.82.100; prior: 1913 c 146 s 9, part; RRS s 5358, part. Formerly RCW 29.82.100.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 361: See notes following RCW 29A.16.040.

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 205: See note following RCW 29A.56.150.